District of Columbia statutes.
34-2411.02

Investigation of distribution systems outside District of Columbia.

The Secretary of the Army, through the Chief of Engineers, shall have the right at all times to investigate the distribution systems of any community outside the District of Columbia supplied with water from the said District of Columbia water system and if, in his opinion, there is an excessive wastage of water, he shall have the right to curtail the supply to said communities to the amount of such wastage.

June 26, 1947, 61 Stat. 182, ch. 149, § 2
1981 Ed., § 43-1542.
1973 Ed., § 43-1531b.